New York, session 2025-2026, S2005.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "sex trade 2 survivors justice and equality act". 3 § 2. Section 230.01 of the penal law, as amended by chapter 23 of the 4 laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 5 § 230.01 Prostitution; affirmative defense. 6 In any prosecution under [section 230.00, section 230.03,] section 7 230.19, section 230.20, subdivision [2] two of section 230.25, subdivi- 8 sion [2] two of section 230.30 or section 230.34-a of this article, it 9 is an affirmative defense that the defendant's participation in the 10 offense was a result of having been a victim of compelling prostitution 11 under section 230.33 of this article, a victim of sex trafficking under 12 section 230.34 of this article, a victim of sex trafficking of a child 13 under section 230.34-a of this article or a victim of trafficking in 14 persons under the trafficking victims protection act (United States 15 Code, Title 22, Chapter 78). 16 § 3. Section 230.02 of the penal law, as amended by chapter 627 of 17 laws of 1978, the section heading and subdivision 1 as amended by chap- 18 ter 368 of the laws of 2015, is amended to read as follows: 19 § 230.02 Patronizing a person for prostitution; definitions. 20 1. A person patronizes a person for prostitution when: 21 (a) Pursuant to a prior understanding, [he or she] such person pays a 22 fee, or anything of value, to another person as compensation for such 23 person or a third person having engaged in sexual conduct with [him or 24 her] such principal person; or 25 (b) [He or she] Such person pays or agrees to pay a fee, or anything 26 of value, to another person pursuant to an understanding that in return 27 therefor such person or a third person will engage in sexual conduct 28 with [him or her] such principal person; or 29 (c) [He or she] Such person solicits or requests another person to 30 engage in sexual conduct with [him or her] such principal person in 31 return for a fee, or anything of value. 32 2. As used in this article[,]: 33 (a) "person who is patronized" means the person with whom the defend- 34 ant engaged in sexual conduct or was to have engaged in sexual conduct 35 pursuant to the understanding, or the person who was solicited or 36 requested by the defendant to engage in sexual conduct; 37 (b) "prostitution" means the act of engaging in or agreeing to engage 38 in sexual conduct with another person in return for a fee or anything of 39 value that is given or received by a person. 40 § 4. Section 230.15 of the penal law, subdivisions 1 and 2 as amended 41 by chapter 368 of the laws of 2015, is amended to read as follows: 42 § 230.15 Promoting prostitution; definitions of terms. 43 The following definitions are applicable to this article: 44 1. "Advance prostitution." A person "advances prostitution" when, 45 acting other than as a person in prostitution [or as a patron thereof], 46 [he or she] such person knowingly causes or aids a person to commit or 47 engage in prostitution, procures or solicits patrons for prostitution, 48 provides persons or premises for prostitution purposes, operates or 49 assists in the operation of a house of prostitution or a prostitution 50 enterprise, or engages in any other conduct designed to institute, aid 51 or facilitate an act or enterprise of prostitution. 52 2. "Profit from prostitution." A person "profits from prostitution" 53 when, acting other than as a person in prostitution receiving compen- S. 2005 3 1 sation for personally rendered prostitution services, [he or she] such 2 person accepts or receives money or other property pursuant to an agree- 3 ment or understanding with any person whereby [he or she] such principal 4 person participates or is to participate in the proceeds of prostitution 5 activity. 6 3. "Prostitution." "Prostitution" means the act of engaging in or 7 agreeing to engage in sexual conduct with another person in return for a 8 fee or anything of value that is given or received by a person. 9 § 5. Section 230.19 of the penal law, as added by chapter 191 of the 10 laws of 2011, subdivision 1 as amended by chapter 368 of the laws of 11 2015, is amended to read as follows: 12 § 230.19 Promoting prostitution in a school zone. 13 1. A person is guilty of promoting prostitution in a school zone when, 14 being nineteen years old or more, [he or she] such person knowingly 15 advances or profits from prostitution that [he or she] such person knows 16 or reasonably should know is or will be committed [in violation of 17 section 230.03 of this article] in a school zone during the hours that 18 school is in session. 19 2. For purposes of this section, "school zone" [shall mean "school 20 zone" as defined in subdivision two of section 230.03 of this article] 21 means (a) in or on or within any building, structure, athletic playing 22 field, playground or land contained within the real property boundary 23 line of a public or private elementary, parochial, intermediate, junior 24 high, vocational, or high school, or (b) any public sidewalk, street, 25 parking lot, park, playground or private land, located immediately adja- 26 cent to the boundary line of such school. 27 Promoting prostitution in a school zone is a class E felony. 28 § 6. Section 230.35 of the penal law, as amended by chapter 368 of the 29 laws of 2015, is amended to read as follows: 30 § 230.35 Promoting or compelling prostitution; accomplice. 31 In a prosecution for promoting prostitution or compelling prostitu- 32 tion, a person [less than eighteen years old] from whose prostitution 33 activity another person is alleged to have advanced or attempted to 34 advance or profited or attempted to profit shall not be deemed to be an 35 accomplice. 36 § 7. Subdivision 1 of section 80.05 of the penal law, as amended by 37 chapter 669 of the laws of 1984, is amended to read as follows: 38 1. Class A misdemeanor. A sentence to pay a fine for a class A misde- 39 meanor shall be a sentence to pay an amount, fixed by the court, not 40 exceeding one thousand dollars, provided, however, that a sentence 41 imposed for a violation of section 215.80 of this chapter may include a 42 fine in an amount equivalent to double the value of the property unlaw- 43 fully disposed of in the commission of the crime; provided however that 44 no sentence imposed by this section shall be imposed on any individual 45 sentenced under subdivision one of section 80.20 of this article. 46 § 8. The penal law is amended by adding a new section 80.20 to read as 47 follows: 48 § 80.20 Imposition of fines in relation to certain violations of article 49 230. 50 1. A person whose violation of section 230.04 of this chapter results 51 in a judicial disposition other than acquittal, adjournment in contem- 52 plation of dismissal or dismissal shall be required to pay a fine, as 53 fixed by the court based on the defendant's "net taxable income," as 54 defined in subdivision four of this section, which shall be determined 55 by the completion of a compulsory financial disclosure at the time of 56 sentencing. The fine shall be distributed to the victims of sexual S. 2005 4 1 exploitation fund established by section ninety-seven-bbbb of the state 2 finance law. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the penalty 3 imposed under this section shall be a substitute for any fines imposed 4 under subdivision one of section 80.05 of this article. 5 2. After the completion of a compulsory financial disclosure, if it is 6 determined that a defendant is in a financial position to pay a fine, 7 such defendant shall pay a fine calculated as provided in this subdivi- 8 sion. Except for individuals who are determined to be unable to pay a 9 fine, the schedule of fines shall be as follows: 10 Amount of net taxable income: Schedule of Fines: 11 (a) Less than thirty thousand Fifty dollars 12 dollars 13 (b) Thirty thousand dollars or One hundred dollars 14 more, but less than fifty 15 thousand dollars 16 (c) Fifty thousand dollars or Two hundred dollars 17 more, but less than seventy-five 18 thousand dollars 19 (d) Seventy-five thousand dollars Three hundred dollars 20 or more, but less than one hundred 21 thousand dollars 22 (e) One hundred thousand dollars or Five hundred dollars 23 more, but less than one hundred fifty 24 thousand dollars 25 (f) One hundred fifty thousand Seven hundred dollars 26 dollars or more, but less than two 27 hundred thousand dollars 28 (g) Greater than two hundred One thousand dollars 29 thousand dollars 30 3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person whose 31 violation of any offense enumerated under section 230.05, 230.06, 32 230.19, 230.20, 230.25, 230.30, 230.32, 230.33, 230.34, or 230.34-a of 33 this chapter that results in a judicial disposition other than acquit- 34 tal, adjournment in contemplation of dismissal or dismissal shall pay a 35 fine the sum of which will be calculated at the time of sentencing, on a 36 sliding scale, based on their net taxable income, which shall be deter- 37 mined by the completion of a compulsory financial disclosure. If it is 38 determined that such defendant is in a financial position to pay a 39 prescribed fine, such defendant shall pay a fine in one of the following 40 amounts to the court, to be distributed to the victims of sexual exploi- 41 tation fund established by section ninety-seven-bbbb of the state 42 finance law. 43 (a) A person convicted of a first offense shall pay a fine of not less 44 than one thousand dollars and not more than the maximum amount applica- 45 ble under section 80.00 of this article. 46 (b) A person convicted of a second offense shall pay a fine of not 47 less than five thousand dollars nor more than twenty-five thousand 48 dollars. 49 (c) A person convicted of a third or subsequent offense shall pay a 50 fine of not less than ten thousand dollars nor more than fifty thousand 51 dollars. 52 4. (a) If the defendant is assessed a fine or fee by the court but can 53 prove they will have financial difficulty paying the amount in one lump 54 sum an installment payment plan may be provided as described in this 55 subdivision. Any such installment payment plan shall include all fines, 56 fees and mandatory surcharges and shall consist of monthly payments that S. 2005 5 1 do not exceed two percent of such person's monthly net taxable income or 2 ten dollars per month, whichever is greater. For the purpose of this 3 subdivision, the term "net taxable income" means a person's total income 4 from all sources and assets, minus deductions required by law including 5 but not limited to administrative or court-ordered garnishments and 6 support payments. A court or hearing officer may require the 7 submission of a financial disclosure report from all persons who opt to 8 enter into installment payment plans. A court or hearing officer also 9 may accept payments higher than the set amount, but may not undertake 10 additional collection activity so long as the person meets their obli- 11 gations under the installment payment plan. A court or hearing officer 12 may require a person entering installment payment plans to appear peri- 13 odically before such court or hearing officer, but no more frequently 14 than annually, to assess the financial circumstances of such person, and 15 may set a new payment amount if such person's financial circumstances 16 have changed. A person who enters into an installment payment plan and 17 experiences a reduction in net taxable income may petition the court or 18 hearing officer at any time to seek a reduction in the monthly payment. 19 (b) The court or hearing officer shall have the discretion in the 20 interests of justice to reduce or waive the amount of any fine, fee or 21 mandatory surcharge assessed for a violation of any of the provisions of 22 this chapter. 23 5. Fines collected under this article shall be deposited into the 24 victims of sexual exploitation fund created by section ninety-seven-bbbb 25 of the state finance law and distributed in the following manner: 26 (a) subject to the availability of funds, fifty percent shall be 27 distributed by the office of victim services to make grants to victims 28 of sexual exploitation fund created by section ninety-seven-bbbb of the 29 state finance law. Subject to the availability of funds, the office of 30 victim services shall make grants to victims of sexual exploitation and 31 sex trafficking who do not otherwise qualify for funds from the crime 32 victims compensation fund. Such available funds may be used to remedy 33 personal injury, loss of essential personal property, medical and coun- 34 seling services, lost wages, savings, or lost support, transportation, 35 occupational/vocational rehabilitation, use of shelters by victims and 36 their children, housing and moving expenses and other costs and/or 37 expenses as the task force deems appropriate. 38 (b) the remaining fifty percent of such funds shall be allocated to 39 various jurisdictions and localities as the interagency task force on 40 human trafficking deems appropriate in order to: 41 (1) develop, expand or strengthen programs for victims of human traf- 42 ficking and sexual exploitation, including: 43 (i) health services, including mental health services; 44 (ii) temporary and permanent housing placement; 45 (iii) legal and immigration services; 46 (iv) employment placement, education and training; and 47 (v) safe harbour programs for sexually exploited children; 48 (2) ensure prevention of human trafficking and sexual exploitation, 49 including increasing public awareness; and/or 50 (3) ensure protection of victims of human trafficking and sexual 51 exploitation, including training of first responders. 52 § 9. Section 230.00 of the penal law is REPEALED. 53 § 10. Section 230.03 of the penal law is REPEALED. 54 § 11. Section 230.07 of the penal law is REPEALED. 55 § 12. Section 1.20 of the criminal procedure law is amended by adding 56 a new subdivision 46 to read as follows: S. 2005 6 1 46. "Vacatur" of convictions under paragraph (i) of subdivision one of 2 section 440.10 of this chapter means, to dismiss the judgment, to 3 dismiss the accusatory instrument, and mark all records as vacated based 4 on the merits. The court shall make a copy of all official records and 5 papers available to the defendant. 6 § 13. The criminal procedure law is amended by adding a new section 7 440.46-b to read as follows: 8 § 440.46-b Motion for resentence; persons convicted of certain prostitu- 9 tion offenses. 10 1. When a person has been convicted, whether by trial verdict or guil- 11 ty plea, under former section 230.00, 230.03 or 240.37 of the penal law, 12 then the chief administrative judge of the state of New York shall, in 13 accordance with this section, automatically vacate, dismiss and expunge 14 such conviction in accordance with section 160.50 of this chapter, and 15 the office of court administration shall immediately notify the state 16 division of criminal justice services, state department of corrections 17 and community supervision and the appropriate local correctional facili- 18 ty which shall immediately effectuate the appropriate relief. Such 19 notification to the division of criminal justice services shall also 20 direct that such agency notify all relevant police and law enforcement 21 agencies of their duty to destroy and/or mark records related to such 22 case in accordance with section 160.50 of this chapter. Nothing in this 23 section shall prevent a person who believes their sentence is required 24 by this section to be vacated, dismissed and/or expunged from filing a 25 petition with the court to effectuate all appropriate relief. 26 2. (a) When a person has been convicted in this state, whether by 27 trial verdict or guilty plea, under former section 230.00, 230.03 or 28 240.37 of the penal law, then such person may petition the court of 29 conviction pursuant to this article for vacatur of such conviction. 30 (b) Upon receiving a served and filed motion under paragraph (a) of 31 this subdivision, the court shall presume the movant satisfies the 32 criteria in such paragraph (a) and shall grant the motion to vacate such 33 conviction unless the party opposing the motion proves, by clear and 34 convincing evidence, that the movant does not satisfy the criteria. If 35 the movant satisfies the criteria, the court shall grant the motion to 36 vacate the conviction if: (i) the conviction was by plea of guilty, on 37 grounds that such plea was not knowing, voluntary and intelligent owing 38 to ongoing consequences; and (ii) the conviction was by verdict or 39 otherwise, on grounds that such conviction and sentence constitutes 40 cruel and unusual punishment under the state constitution owing to such 41 ongoing consequences; and may, if the petition meets the criteria in 42 subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, after affording the parties an 43 opportunity to be heard and present evidence, substitute, unless it is 44 not in the interests of justice to do so, a conviction for an appropri- 45 ate lesser offense under article two hundred thirty of the penal law. 46 (c) In the event of any vacatur pursuant to this subdivision, the 47 office of court administration shall immediately notify the state divi- 48 sion of criminal justice services concerning such determination. Such 49 notification to the division of criminal justice services shall also 50 direct that such agency notify all relevant police and law enforcement 51 agencies of their duty to destroy and/or mark records related to such 52 case in accordance with section 160.50 of this chapter, and update such 53 agencies' records accordingly. 54 3. The chief administrator of the courts shall promulgate all neces- 55 sary rules and make available all necessary forms to enable the filing 56 of the petitions and applications provided in this section no later than S. 2005 7 1 sixty days following the effective date of this section. All sentences 2 eligible for automatic vacatur, dismissal and expungement pursuant to 3 subdivision one of this section shall be identified and the required 4 entities notified within one year of the effective date of this section. 5 § 14. Section 6512 of the education law is amended by adding a new 6 subdivision 3 to read as follows: 7 3. If the department conducts an investigation into acts alleged to be 8 the unauthorized practice of massage therapy under article one hundred 9 fifty-five of this chapter, the department shall consider whether or not 10 the individual who allegedly committed the acts did so as a result of 11 having been a victim of compelling prostitution under section 230.33, of 12 sex trafficking under section 230.34 or of sex trafficking of a child 13 under section 230.34-a of the penal law. In the event that the depart- 14 ment suspects that such individual has been the victim of one or more 15 such offenses, the department shall make an immediate referral of the 16 matter to local service providers, as defined by the Safe Harbour For 17 Exploited Children Act or by the office of children and family services. 18 If the department subsequently reports the matter to the attorney gener- 19 al with a request for prosecution, the department shall inform the 20 attorney general of such suspicions and referral. 21 § 15. The civil practice law and rules is amended by adding a new 22 section 4519-b to read as follows: 23 § 4519-b. Possession of reproductive or sexual health devices; receipt 24 into evidence. 1. Evidence that a person was in possession of a condom 25 or other reproductive or sexual health device may not be received in 26 evidence in any trial, hearing or proceeding in relation to any allega- 27 tion of a misdemeanor offense pursuant to subdivision one of section 28 twelve and article ten of the multiple dwelling law, sections twelve-a 29 and twenty-three hundred twenty of the public health law, section two 30 hundred thirty-one of the real property law or subdivision five of 31 section seven hundred eleven and section seven hundred fifteen of the 32 real property actions and proceedings law, or by any law, local law or 33 ordinance of a municipality or political subdivision of the state, or 34 any word, rule, or regulation of any governmental instrumentality 35 authorized by law to adopt the same as evidence of conduct which would 36 constitute an offense defined in article two hundred thirty of the penal 37 law. 38 2. "Reproductive or sexual health device" shall include, but shall not 39 be limited to, any contraceptive or other tool used to prevent unwanted 40 pregnancy or the transmission of HIV or other sexually transmitted 41 diseases, including but not limited to male condoms, female condoms, 42 lubricants, pre-exposure prophylaxis (PrEP), post-exposure prophylaxis 43 (PEP), HIV anti-retroviral medication, spermicide, hormonal methods, 44 emergency contraception, diaphragm, cervical cap, or sponge. 45 § 16. Section 60.47 of the criminal procedure law, as amended by chap- 46 ter 23 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 47 § 60.47 Possession of condoms or other reproductive or sexual health 48 device; receipt into evidence for allegations of misdemeanor 49 offenses. 50 1. Evidence that a person was in possession of one or more condoms or 51 other reproductive or sexual health device may not be admitted at any 52 trial, hearing, or other proceeding in a prosecution for [section 53 230.00] any misdemeanor offense, or an attempt to commit any misdemeanor 54 offense, defined in article two hundred thirty of the penal law, or 55 section sixty-five hundred twelve of the education law, or any law, 56 local law or ordinance of a municipality or political subdivision of S. 2005 8 1 state, or any word, rule or regulation of any governmental instrumen- 2 tality authorized by law to adopt the same, for the purpose of estab- 3 lishing probable cause for an arrest or proving any person's commission 4 or attempted commission of such offense. 5 2. "Reproductive or sexual health device" shall include, but shall not 6 be limited to, any contraceptive or other tool used to prevent unwanted 7 pregnancy or the transmission of HIV or other sexually transmitted 8 diseases, including but not limited to male condoms, female condoms, 9 lubricants, pre-exposure prophylaxis (PrEP), post-exposure prophylaxis 10 (PEP), HIV anti-retroviral medication, spermicide, hormonal methods, 11 emergency contraception, diaphragm, cervical cap, or sponge. 12 § 17. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 1 of section 532-d of the executive 13 law, as amended by section 5 of part M of chapter 56 of the laws of 14 2017, is amended to read as follows: 15 (c) A homeless youth who entered a transitional independent living 16 program under the age of [twenty-one] twenty-four may continue to 17 receive shelter services in such program beyond the applicable period 18 authorized by paragraph (b) of this subdivision, if the municipality has 19 notified the office of children and family services in accordance with 20 clause (iv) of subparagraph three of paragraph a of subdivision two of 21 section four hundred twenty of this chapter; 22 § 18. Section 214-d of the executive law, as added by chapter 368 of 23 the laws of 2015, is amended to read as follows: 24 § 214-d. Human trafficking and sexual exploitation awareness. The 25 superintendent, in consultation with the office of temporary and disa- 26 bility assistance, the office of children and family services, and the 27 division of criminal justice services, shall: 28 [(1)] 1. (a) develop, maintain and disseminate to all members of the 29 state police, including new and veteran officers, written policies, 30 procedures and educational materials relating to human trafficking and 31 sexually exploited victims, including but not limited to, (i) services 32 available for victims of human trafficking and services available for 33 victims of sexual exploitation, as referenced in section four hundred 34 eighty-three-bb of the social services law, and title eight-A of article 35 six of the social services law; and (ii) education on the impact of the 36 trauma and emotional harm experienced by victims of human trafficking 37 and sexual exploitation; and 38 [(2)] (b) establish and implement trauma informed written procedures 39 and policies in the event a member of the division of state police 40 encounters an individual believed to be a victim of human trafficking, 41 or victim of sexual exploitation which shall include, but not be limited 42 to, the provision of information and/or referral to an appropriate 43 provider of social and legal services to human trafficking, or sexually 44 exploited victims[, in accordance with such section four hundred eight- 45 y-three-bb]; and 46 (c) establish and implement trauma informed written procedures and 47 policies in the event a member of the division of state police encount- 48 ers such victim, including the provision of information and referral to 49 the appropriate services. 50 2. In the development of such program, the commissioners, and super- 51 intendent of state police shall seek the recommendations of a broad 52 range of experts such as social service providers, certified and 53 licensed social workers, others with educational expertise in human 54 trafficking, sexual exploitation, intimate partner violence, sexual 55 assault, reproductive and sexual health care, and serving lesbian, gay, 56 bisexual, transgender and questioning individuals. S. 2005 9 1 3. The superintendent shall make available to all local law enforce- 2 ment all materials, trainings, and resources developed pursuant to this 3 chapter. 4 § 19. Section 650 of the county law is amended by adding a new subdi- 5 vision 3 to read as follows: 6 3. The sheriff, in any county with greater than one hundred thousand 7 residents according to the most recent census, shall, for all members of 8 the department: 9 (a) adopt, maintain, and disseminate written policies, and educational 10 materials, regarding human trafficking and sexual exploitation, includ- 11 ing, but not limited to: (i) services available for victims of human 12 trafficking or sexual exploitation; and (ii) education on the impact of 13 the trauma and emotional harm experienced by victims of human traffick- 14 ing and sexual exploitation; 15 (b) establish, and implement on an ongoing basis, a training program 16 for all current and new employees regarding the policies and procedures 17 established pursuant to this section; and 18 (c) establish and implement trauma informed written procedures and 19 policies in the event a member of the police department encounters such 20 victim, including the provision of information and referral to the 21 appropriate services. 22 § 20. Section 39 of the town law, as amended by chapter 476 of the 23 laws of 2018, is amended to read as follows: 24 § 39. Powers and duties of constables and town police officers. 1. 25 Constables and town police officers shall have all the power and author- 26 ity conferred upon constables by the general laws of the state and such 27 additional powers, not inconsistent with law, as shall be conferred upon 28 them by the town board. They shall be subject to the general authority 29 and direction of the town board and to such orders and regulations as 30 the town board may prescribe, not inconsistent with law. 31 2. The chief constable or police officer, in any town with greater 32 than one hundred thousand residents according to the most recent census, 33 shall, for all members of the department: 34 (a) adopt, maintain, and disseminate written policies, and educational 35 materials, regarding human trafficking and sexual exploitation, includ- 36 ing, but not limited to: 37 (i) services available for victims of human trafficking or sexual 38 exploitation; and 39 (ii) education on the impact of the trauma and emotional harm experi- 40 enced by victims of human trafficking and sexual exploitation; 41 (b) establish, and implement on an ongoing basis, a training program 42 for all current and new employees regarding the policies and procedures 43 established pursuant to this section; and 44 (c) establish and implement trauma informed written procedures and 45 policies in the event a member of the police department encounters such 46 victim, including the provision of information and referral to the 47 appropriate services. 48 § 21. Section 841 of the executive law is amended by adding a new 49 subdivision 7-c to read as follows: 50 7-c. Take such steps as may be necessary to ensure that all police 51 officers and peace officers certified pursuant to subdivision three of 52 this section receive appropriate instruction regarding the evidentiary 53 prohibition set forth in section 60.47 of the criminal procedure law and 54 section forty-five hundred nineteen-b of the civil practice law and 55 rules relating to the use of condoms and other reproductive or sexual 56 health devices as evidence in certain misdemeanor trials, hearings or S. 2005 10 1 proceedings, or as a basis for probable cause for arrest, including that 2 unauthorized seizure or confiscation of condoms and other reproductive 3 or sexual health devices as a breach of public policy; 4 § 22. Section 447-a of the social services law, as added by chapter 5 569 of the laws of 2008, subdivision 1 as amended by chapter 189 of the 6 laws of 2018, paragraphs (c) and (d) of subdivision 1 as amended by 7 chapter 23 of the laws of 2021, subdivision 2 as amended by section 8 of 8 part M of chapter 56 of the laws of 2017, and subdivisions 4 and 5 as 9 amended by section 1 of part G of chapter 58 of the laws of 2010, is 10 amended to read as follows: 11 § 447-a. Definitions. As used in this title: 12 1. The term "sexually exploited [child] individual" means any person 13 under the age of [eighteen] twenty-four at the time of identification 14 who has been subject to sexual exploitation because [he or she] such 15 person: 16 (a) is the victim of the crime of sex trafficking as defined in 17 section 230.34 of the penal law or the crime of sex trafficking of [a 18 child] an individual as defined in section 230.34-a of the penal law; or 19 (b) [engages in any act as defined in section 230.00 of the penal law; 20 (c)] is a victim of the crime of compelling prostitution as defined in 21 section 230.33 of the penal law[; 22 (d) engages in acts or conduct described in article two hundred 23 sixty-three of the penal law]. 24 2. The term "short-term safe house" means a residential facility oper- 25 ated by an authorized agency as defined in subdivision ten of section 26 three hundred seventy-one of this article including a residential facil- 27 ity operating as part of a runaway and homeless youth crisis services 28 program as defined in subdivision four of section five hundred thirty- 29 two-a of the executive law or a not-for-profit agency with experience in 30 providing services to sexually exploited youth and approved in accord- 31 ance with the regulations of the office of children and family services 32 that provides emergency shelter, services and care to sexually exploited 33 [children] individuals including food, shelter, clothing, medical care, 34 counseling and appropriate crisis intervention services at the time they 35 are taken into custody by law enforcement and for the duration of any 36 legal proceeding or proceedings in which they are either the complaining 37 witness or the subject [child] individual. The short-term safe house 38 shall also be available at the point in time that [a child] an individ- 39 ual under the age of [eighteen] twenty-four has first come into the 40 custody of juvenile detention officials, law enforcement, local jails or 41 the local commissioner of social services or is residing with the local 42 runaway and homeless youth authority. 43 3. The term "advocate" means an employee of the short-term safe house 44 defined in subdivision two of this section that has been trained to work 45 with and advocate for the needs of sexually exploited [children] indi- 46 viduals. The advocate shall accompany the [child] individual to all 47 court appearances and will serve as a liaison between the short-term 48 safe house and the court. 49 4. The term "safe house" means a residential facility operated by an 50 authorized agency as defined in subdivision ten of section three hundred 51 seventy-one of this article including a residential facility operating 52 as part of an approved runaway program as defined in subdivision four of 53 section five hundred thirty-two-a of the executive law or a not-for-pro- 54 fit agency with experience in providing services to sexually exploited 55 youth and approved in accordance with the regulations of the office of 56 children and family services that provides shelter for sexually S. 2005 11 1 exploited [children] individuals. In addition, a long-term safe house 2 may be operated by a transitional independent living support program as 3 defined in subdivision six of section five hundred thirty-two-a of the 4 executive law. A safe house serving sexually exploited [children] indi- 5 viduals as defined in this title shall provide or assist in securing 6 necessary services for such sexually exploited [children] individuals 7 either through direct provision of services, or through written agree- 8 ments with other community and public agencies for the provision of 9 services including but not limited to housing, assessment, case manage- 10 ment, medical care, legal, mental health and substance and alcohol abuse 11 services. Where appropriate such safe house in accordance with a service 12 plan for such sexually exploited [child] individual may also provide 13 counseling and therapeutic services, educational services including life 14 skills services and planning services to successfully transition resi- 15 dents back to the community. Nothing in the provisions of this title or 16 article nineteen-H of the executive law shall prevent [a child] an indi- 17 vidual who is the subject of a proceeding which has not reached final 18 disposition from residing at the safe house for the duration of that 19 proceeding nor shall it prevent any sexually exploited [child] individ- 20 ual who is not the subject of a proceeding from residing at the safe 21 house. [An] For individuals under the age of eighteen, an advocate 22 employed by a short-term safe house or other appropriate staff of a 23 short-term safe house shall, to the maximum extent possible, preferably 24 within twenty-four hours but within no more than seventy-two hours 25 following a sexually exploited [child's] individual's admission into the 26 program other than pursuant to a court order, notify such [child's] 27 individual's parent, guardian or custodian of [his or her] such individ- 28 ual's physical and emotional condition and the circumstances surrounding 29 the [child's] individual's presence at the program, unless there are 30 compelling circumstances why the parent, guardian or custodian should 31 not be so notified. Where such circumstances exist, the advocate or 32 other appropriate staff member shall either file an appropriate petition 33 in the family court, refer the youth to the local social services 34 district, or in instances where abuse or neglect is suspected, report 35 such case pursuant to title six of this article. 36 5. The term "community-based program" means a program operated by a 37 not-for-profit organization that provides services such as street 38 outreach, voluntary drop-in services, peer counseling, individual coun- 39 seling, family-therapy and referrals for services such as educational 40 and vocational training and health care. Any such community-based 41 program may also work with the safe house serving sexually exploited 42 [children] individuals as defined in this title to provide transitional 43 services to such [children] individuals returning to the community. 44 § 23. Section 447-b of the social services law, as added by chapter 45 569 of the laws of 2008, subdivisions 1, 2, 3, 5 and 6 as amended by 46 section 2 of part G of chapter 58 of the laws of 2010, is amended to 47 read as follows: 48 § 447-b. Services for exploited [children] individuals. 1. Notwith- 49 standing any inconsistent provision of law, pursuant to regulations of 50 the office of children and family services, every local social services 51 district shall as a component of the district's multi-year consolidated 52 services child welfare services plan address the [child] welfare 53 services needs of sexually exploited [children] individuals and to the 54 extent that funds are available specifically therefor ensure that a 55 short-term safe house or another short-term safe placement such as an 56 approved runaway and homeless youth program, approved respite or crisis S. 2005 12 1 program providing crisis intervention or respite services or community- 2 based program to serve sexually exploited [children] individuals is 3 available to [children] individuals residing in such district. Nothing 4 in this section shall prohibit a local social services district from 5 utilizing existing respite or crisis intervention services already oper- 6 ated by such social services district or homeless youth programs or 7 services for victims of human trafficking pursuant to article ten-D of 8 this chapter so long as the staff members have received appropriate 9 training approved by the office of children and family services regard- 10 ing sexually exploited [children] individuals and the existing programs 11 and facilities provide a safe, secure and appropriate environment for 12 sexually exploited [children] individuals. Crisis intervention 13 services, short-term safe house care and community-based programming 14 may, where appropriate, be provided by the same not-for-profit agency. 15 Local social services districts may work cooperatively to provide such 16 short-term safe house or other short-term safe placement, services and 17 programming and access to such placement, services and programming may 18 be provided on a regional basis, provided, however, that every local 19 social services district shall to the extent that funds are available 20 ensure that such placement, services and programs shall be readily 21 accessible to sexually exploited [children] individuals residing within 22 the district. 23 2. All of the services created under this title may, to the extent 24 possible provided by law, be available to all sexually exploited [chil- 25 dren] individuals whether they are accessed voluntarily, as a condition 26 of an adjournment in contemplation of dismissal issued in criminal 27 court, through the diversion services created under section seven 28 hundred thirty-five of the family court act, through a proceeding under 29 article three of the family court act, a proceeding under article ten of 30 the family court act or through a referral from a local social services 31 agency. 32 3. The capacity of the crisis intervention services and community- 33 based programs in subdivision one of this section shall be based on the 34 number of sexually exploited [children] individuals in each district who 35 are in need of such services. A determination of such need shall be made 36 in two thousand ten and every five years thereafter in every social 37 services district by the local commissioner of social services and be 38 included in the integrated county plan. Such determination shall be made 39 in consultation with local law enforcement, runaway and homeless youth 40 program providers, local probation departments, local social services 41 commissioners, the runaway and homeless youth coordinator for the local 42 social services district, local law guardians, presentment agencies, 43 public defenders and district attorney's offices and child advocates and 44 services providers who work directly with sexually exploited youth. 45 4. In determining the need for and capacity of the services created 46 under this section, each local social services district shall recognize 47 that sexually exploited youth have separate and distinct service needs 48 according to gender and, where a local social services district deter- 49 mines that the need exists, to the extent that funds are available, 50 appropriate programming shall be made available. 51 5. To the extent funds are specifically appropriated therefor, the 52 office of children and family services shall contract with an appropri- 53 ate not-for-profit agency with experience working with sexually 54 exploited [children] individuals to operate at least one long-term safe 55 house in a geographically appropriate area of the state which shall 56 provide safe and secure long term housing and specialized services for S. 2005 13 1 sexually exploited [children] individuals throughout the state. The 2 appropriateness of the geographic location shall be determined taking 3 into account the areas of the state with high numbers of sexually 4 exploited [children] individuals and the need for sexually exploited 5 [children] individuals to find shelter and long term placement in a 6 region that cannot be readily accessed by the perpetrators of sexual 7 exploitation. The need for more than one long-term safe house shall be 8 determined by the office of children and family services based on the 9 numbers and geographical location of sexually exploited [children] indi- 10 viduals within the state. Nothing herein shall be construed to preclude 11 an agency from applying for and accepting grants, gifts and bequests of 12 funds from private individuals, foundations and the federal government 13 for the purpose of creating or carrying out the duties of a long-term 14 safe house. 15 6. The local social services commissioner may, to the extent that 16 funds are available, in conjunction with the division of criminal 17 justice services and local law enforcement officials, contract with an 18 appropriate not-for-profit agency with experience working with sexually 19 exploited [children] individuals to train law enforcement officials who 20 are likely to encounter sexually exploited [children] individuals in the 21 course of their law enforcement duties on the provisions of this section 22 and how to identify and obtain appropriate services for sexually 23 exploited [children] individuals. Local social services districts may 24 work cooperatively to provide such training and such training may be 25 provided on a regional basis. The division of criminal justice services 26 shall assist local social services districts in obtaining any available 27 funds for the purposes of conducting law enforcement training from the 28 federal justice department and the office of juvenile justice and delin- 29 quency prevention. 30 § 24. Subdivision (a) of section 483-aa of the social services law, as 31 added by chapter 74 of the laws of 2007, is amended to read as follows: 32 (a) "Human trafficking victim" means a person who is a victim of sex 33 trafficking as defined in section 230.34 of the penal law or a victim of 34 labor trafficking as defined in section 135.35 of the penal law or, 35 where a commercial sex act is induced by force, fraud, or coercion, or 36 in which the person induced to perform such act has not attained eigh- 37 teen years of age, or as defined under section 12 of 22 U.S. Code § 7102 38 - Sex Trafficking. ("sex trafficking" means the recruitment, harboring, 39 transportation, provision, obtaining, patronizing, or soliciting of a 40 person for the purpose of a commercial sex act). 41 § 25. Subdivision (a) of section 483-bb of the social services law, as 42 added by chapter 74 of the laws of 2007, is amended and a new subdivi- 43 sion (d) is added to read as follows: 44 (a) The office of temporary and disability assistance [may] shall 45 coordinate with and assist law enforcement agencies and district attor- 46 ney's offices to access appropriate services for human trafficking 47 victims. 48 (d) Annually the provision of such services shall be reviewed and 49 evaluated to ensure that victims of human trafficking are able to access 50 and to utilize such services in an appropriate and helpful manner by the 51 interagency task force on human trafficking created in section four 52 hundred eighty-three-aa of this article. If the task force determines 53 that the services prescribed herein are not appropriate, not being 54 accessed or utilized the task force shall determine protocols to ensure 55 that such services are more accessible and are more readily available. S. 2005 14 1 § 26. Section 483-ee of the social services law, as amended by chapter 2 413 of the laws of 2016, subdivision (a) as amended by chapter 496 of 3 the laws of 2023 and subdivision (b) as amended by chapter 497 of the 4 laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 5 § 483-ee. Establishment of interagency task force on human traffick- 6 ing. (a) There is established an interagency task force on trafficking 7 in persons, which shall consist of the following members or their desig- 8 nees: (1) the commissioner of the division of criminal justice services; 9 (2) the commissioner of the office of temporary and disability assist- 10 ance; (3) the commissioner of health; (4) the commissioner of the office 11 of mental health; (5) the commissioner of labor; (6) the commissioner of 12 the office of children and family services; (7) the commissioner of the 13 office of addiction services and supports; (8) the director of the 14 office of victim services; (9) the executive director of the office for 15 the prevention of domestic violence; (10) the superintendent of the 16 division of state police; (11) the secretary of state; and the following 17 additional members, who shall be promptly appointed by the governor, 18 each for a term of two years, provided that such person's membership 19 shall continue after such two year term until a successor is appointed 20 and provided, further, that a member may be reappointed if again recom- 21 mended in the manner specified in this subdivision: (12) two members, 22 who shall be appointed on the recommendation of the temporary president 23 of the senate; (13) two members, who shall be appointed on the recommen- 24 dation of the speaker of the assembly; (14) two members, who shall be 25 appointed on the recommendation of the not-for-profit organization in 26 New York state that receives the largest share of funds, appropriated by 27 and through the state budget, for providing services to victims of human 28 trafficking, as shall be identified annually in writing by the director 29 of the budget; and (15) one member, who shall be appointed on the recom- 30 mendation of the president of the New York state bar association; and 31 others as may be necessary to carry out the duties and responsibilities 32 under this section. An effort shall be made to include representatives 33 from the following groups of people: survivors of human trafficking, 34 survivors of sexual exploitation, service providers from various 35 geographic areas of the state, representatives of women's rights organ- 36 izations, representatives of the lesbian gay bisexual transgender and 37 queer populations and representatives from various ethnic demographics 38 across New York state. The task force will be co-chaired by the commis- 39 sioners of the division of criminal justice services and the office of 40 temporary and disability assistance, or their designees. It shall meet 41 as often as is necessary, but no less than three times per year, and 42 under circumstances as are appropriate to fulfilling its duties under 43 this section. All members shall be provided with written notice reason- 44 ably in advance of each meeting with date, time and location of such 45 meeting. 46 (b) The task force shall: (1) collect and organize data on the nature 47 and extent of crimes related to trafficking and sexual exploitation of 48 in persons in the state; (2) identify available federal, state and local 49 programs that provide services to victims of trafficking, including but 50 not limited to case management, housing, health care, mental health 51 counseling, drug addiction screening and treatment, language interpreta- 52 tion and translation services, English language instruction, job train- 53 ing and placement assistance, post-employment services for job 54 retention, and services to assist the individual and any of [his or her] 55 such individual's family members to establish a permanent residence in 56 New York state or the United States; (3) consult with governmental and S. 2005 15 1 non-governmental organizations in developing recommendations to 2 strengthen state and local efforts to prevent trafficking, protect and 3 assist victims of trafficking and prosecute traffickers; (4) establish 4 interagency protocols and collaboration between federal, state, and 5 local law enforcement, state and governmental agencies, child welfare 6 agencies, and non-governmental organizations; (5) evaluate approaches to 7 increase public awareness about trafficking and make recommendations on 8 such approaches; (6) evaluate the effectiveness of training programs on 9 human trafficking that have been designed for law enforcement personnel, 10 criminal defense attorneys, social service providers and non-governmen- 11 tal organizations, and make recommendations for improving the quality 12 and effectiveness of such programs, as well as ensure that said training 13 is occurring on an annual basis; (7) measure and evaluate the progress 14 of the state in preventing trafficking, protecting and providing assist- 15 ance to victims of trafficking, and prosecuting persons engaged in traf- 16 ficking; (8) evaluate the use of social media in and its contribution to 17 human trafficking; and (9) convene any subcommittee necessary, provided 18 such subcommittee has at least one of the members appointed by the 19 speaker of the assembly, temporary president of the senate or governor, 20 to consider specific issues, including, but not limited to: federal, 21 state and/or local cooperation; juveniles and human trafficking; the 22 importance of training and who should receive such training; how data is 23 compiled and shared; and services for and treatment of domestic versus 24 foreign born victims. 25 (c) The task force shall report to the governor, the speaker of the 26 assembly, the minority leader of the assembly, the temporary president 27 of the senate and the minority leader of the senate no less than annual- 28 ly, and it shall additionally issue such reports and recommendations as 29 it deems necessary to carry out its duties and responsibilities. 30 (d) The task force shall work with the state education department to 31 create and implement additional sexual education for students in second- 32 ary school that includes information as it relates to prostitution, its 33 inherent violence and impact on public and individual health. 34 § 27. The state finance law is amended by adding a new section 97-bbbb 35 to read as follows: 36 § 97-bbbb. Victims of sexual exploitation fund. 1. There is estab- 37 lished in the joint custody of the state comptroller and the commission- 38 er of the department of taxation and finance a fund to be known as the 39 "victims of sexual exploitation fund". 40 2. The victims of sexual exploitation fund shall consist of monies 41 received by the state pursuant to section 80.20 of the penal law and all 42 other fees, fines, grants, bequests or other monies credited, appropri- 43 ated or transferred thereto from any other fund or source. 44 3. Monies of the victims of sexual exploitation fund, following appro- 45 priation by the legislature and allocation by the director of the budget 46 shall be made available for grants to victims and local assistance 47 services and expenses of programs to provide services to victims of 48 sexual exploitation as determined by the office of victim services and 49 the interagency task force on human trafficking. 50 § 28. Subdivision a of section 3-118 of the administrative code of the 51 city of New York, as amended by chapter 189 of the laws of 2018, the 52 third undesignated paragraph as amended by chapter 23 of the laws of 53 2021, is amended to read as follows: 54 a. For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the 55 following meanings: S. 2005 16 1 Homeless youth. The term "homeless youth" means persons under the age 2 of [21] 24 who are in need of services and are without a place of shel- 3 ter where supervision and care are available. 4 Sexually exploited youth. The term "sexually exploited youth" means 5 persons under the age of 18 who have been subject to sexual exploitation 6 because they (a) are the victim of the crime of sex trafficking as 7 defined in section 230.34 of the penal law; (b) engage in any act as 8 defined in former section 230.00 of the penal law; (c) are a victim of 9 the crime of compelling prostitution as defined in section 230.33 of the 10 penal law; (d) are a victim of the crime of sex trafficking of a child 11 as defined in section 230.34-a of the penal law; or (e) engage in acts 12 or conduct described in article two hundred sixty-three of the penal 13 law. The term shall also mean persons under the age of 18 who have been 14 subject to incest in the third degree, second degree or first degree, as 15 defined in sections 255.25, 255.26, and 255.27 of the penal law, respec- 16 tively, or any of the sex offenses enumerated in article one hundred 17 thirty of the penal law. 18 § 29. Subdivision 4 of section 170.30 of the criminal procedure law is 19 REPEALED. 20 § 30. Section 60.42 of the criminal procedure law, as amended by 21 section 1 of part R of chapter 55 of the laws of 2019, subdivision 3 as 22 amended by chapter 777 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as 23 follows: 24 § 60.42 Rules of evidence; admissibility of evidence of victim's sexual 25 conduct in sex offense cases. 26 Evidence of a victim's sexual conduct shall not be admissible in a 27 prosecution for an offense or an attempt to commit an offense defined in 28 article one hundred thirty or in section 230.34 of the penal law unless 29 such evidence: 30 1. proves or tends to prove specific instances of the victim's prior 31 sexual conduct with the accused; or 32 2. [proves or tends to prove that the victim has been convicted of an 33 offense under section 230.00 of the penal law within three years prior 34 to the sex offense which is the subject of the prosecution; or 35 3.] rebuts evidence introduced by the people of the victim's failure 36 to engage in vaginal sexual contact, oral sexual contact, anal sexual 37 contact or sexual contact during a given period of time; or 38 [4.] 3. rebuts evidence introduced by the people which proves or tends 39 to prove that the accused is the cause of pregnancy or disease of the 40 victim, or the source of semen found in the victim; or 41 [5.] 4. is determined by the court after an offer of proof by the 42 accused outside the hearing of the jury, or such hearing as the court 43 may require, and a statement by the court of its findings of fact essen- 44 tial to its determination, to be relevant and admissible in the inter- 45 ests of justice. 46 § 31. The opening paragraph of subdivision 1 of section 170.80 of the 47 criminal procedure law, as amended by chapter 23 of the laws of 2021, is 48 amended to read as follows: 49 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, at any time at or after 50 arraignment on a charge of prostitution pursuant to former section 51 230.00 of the penal law, after consultation with counsel, a knowing and 52 voluntary plea of guilty has been entered to such charge, any judge or 53 justice hearing any stage of such case may, upon consent of the defend- 54 ant after consultation with counsel: S. 2005 17 1 § 32. Subdivision 2 of section 420.35 of the criminal procedure law, 2 as amended by chapter 23 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 2. Except as provided in this subdivision or subdivision two-a of this 5 section, under no circumstances shall the mandatory surcharge, sex 6 offender registration fee, DNA databank fee or the crime victim assist- 7 ance fee be waived. A court shall waive any mandatory surcharge, DNA 8 databank fee and crime victim assistance fee when: (i) the defendant is 9 convicted of prostitution under former section 230.00 of the penal law; 10 (ii) the defendant is convicted of a violation in the event such 11 conviction is in lieu of a plea to or conviction for prostitution under 12 former section 230.00 of the penal law; (iii) the court finds that a 13 defendant is a victim of sex trafficking under section 230.34 of the 14 penal law or a victim of trafficking in persons under the trafficking 15 victims protection act (United States Code, Title 22, Chapter 78); or 16 (iv) the court finds that the defendant is a victim of sex trafficking 17 of a child under section 230.34-a of the penal law. 18 § 33. Subdivision 4 of section 720.15 of the criminal procedure law, 19 as amended by chapter 23 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as 20 follows: 21 4. Notwithstanding any provision in this article, a person charged 22 with prostitution as defined in former section 230.00 of the penal law 23 regardless of whether such person (i) had prior to commencement of trial 24 or entry of a plea of guilty been convicted of a crime or found a youth- 25 ful offender, or (ii) subsequent to such conviction for prostitution is 26 convicted of a crime or found a youthful offender, the provisions of 27 subdivisions one and two of this section requiring or authorizing the 28 accusatory instrument filed against a youth to be sealed, and the 29 arraignment and all proceedings in the action to be conducted in private 30 shall apply. 31 § 34. Subdivision 1 of section 720.35 of the criminal procedure law, 32 as amended by chapter 23 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as 33 follows: 34 1. A youthful offender adjudication is not a judgment of conviction 35 for a crime or any other offense, and does not operate as a disquali- 36 fication of any person so adjudged to hold public office or public 37 employment or to receive any license granted by public authority but 38 shall be deemed a conviction only for the purposes of transfer of super- 39 vision and custody pursuant to section two hundred fifty-nine-m of the 40 executive law. A defendant for whom a youthful offender adjudication was 41 substituted, who was originally charged with prostitution as defined in 42 former section 230.00 of the penal law, shall be deemed a "sexually 43 exploited [child] individual" as defined in subdivision one of section 44 four hundred forty-seven-a of the social services law and therefore 45 shall not be considered an adult for purposes related to the charges in 46 the youthful offender proceeding or a proceeding under section 170.80 of 47 this chapter. 48 § 35. Paragraph (d) of subdivision 4 of section 305.2 of the family 49 court act, as added by section 3 of part G of chapter 58 of the laws of 50 2010, is amended to read as follows: 51 (d) take the child who such officer has decided to take into custody 52 in accordance with this section [or section 305.1 of this part for 53 violating the provisions of section 230.00 of the penal law,] to an 54 available short-term safe house as defined in subdivision two of section 55 four hundred forty-seven-a of the social services law; or S. 2005 18 1 § 36. Section 344.4 of the family court act, as added by chapter 761 2 of the laws of 1987, subdivision 3 as amended by chapter 777 of the laws 3 of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 4 § 344.4. Rules of evidence; admissibility of evidence of victim's 5 sexual conduct in sex offense cases. Evidence of a victim's sexual 6 conduct shall not be admissible in a juvenile delinquency proceeding for 7 a crime or an attempt to commit a crime defined in article one hundred 8 thirty of the penal law unless such evidence: 9 1. proves or tends to prove specific instances of the victim's prior 10 sexual conduct with the accused; or 11 2. [proves or tends to prove that the victim has been convicted of an 12 offense under section 230.00 of the penal law within three years prior 13 to the sex offense which is the subject of the juvenile delinquency 14 proceeding; or 15 3.] rebuts evidence introduced by the presentment agency of the 16 victim's failure to engage in vaginal sexual contact, oral sexual 17 contact, anal sexual contact or sexual contact during a given period of 18 time; or 19 [4.] 3. rebuts evidence introduced by the presentment agency which 20 proves or tends to prove that the accused is the cause of pregnancy or 21 disease of the victim, or the source of semen found in the victim; or 22 [5.] 4. is determined by the court after an offer of proof by the 23 accused, or such hearing as the court may require, and a statement by 24 the court of its findings of fact essential to its determination, to be 25 relevant and admissible in the interests of justice. 26 § 37. Subdivision (a) of section 712 of the family court act, as sepa- 27 rately amended by chapters 92 and 97 of the laws of 2021, is amended to 28 read as follows: 29 (a) "Person in need of supervision". A person less than eighteen years 30 of age: (i) who does not attend school in accordance with the provisions 31 of part one of article sixty-five of the education law; (ii) who is 32 ungovernable or habitually disobedient and beyond the lawful control of 33 a parent or other person legally responsible for such child's care, or 34 other lawful authority; (iii) who violates the provisions of former 35 section 230.00 of the penal law; (iv) or who appears to be a sexually 36 exploited [child] individual as defined in paragraph (a)[, (c)] or [(d)] 37 (b) of subdivision one of section four hundred forty-seven-a of the 38 social services law, but only if the child consents to the filing of a 39 petition under this article. 40 § 38. Subdivision 2 of section 353 of the multiple dwelling law, as 41 amended by chapter 680 of the laws of 1967, is amended to read as 42 follows: 43 2. If there be two or more convictions in such dwelling within a peri- 44 od of six months, under [sections 230.00,] section 230.25[,] or 230.40 45 of the penal law. 46 § 39. Section 2324-a of the public health law, as amended by chapter 47 189 of the laws of 2018, is amended to read as follows: 48 § 2324-a. Presumptive evidence. For the purposes of this title, two or 49 more convictions of any person or persons had, within a period of one 50 year, for any of the offenses described in section [230.00,] 230.05, 51 230.06, 230.08, 230.11, 230.12, 230.13, 230.20, 230.25, 230.30, 230.32 52 or 230.34-a of the penal law arising out of conduct engaged in at the 53 same real property consisting of a dwelling as that term is defined in 54 subdivision four of section four of the multiple dwelling law shall be 55 presumptive evidence of conduct constituting use of the premises for 56 purposes of prostitution. S. 2005 19 1 § 40. Subdivision 3 of section 231 of the real property law, as 2 amended by chapter 368 of the laws of 2015, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 3. For the purposes of this section, two or more convictions of any 5 person or persons had, within a period of one year, for any of the 6 offenses described in section [230.00,] 230.05, 230.06, 230.11, 230.12, 7 230.13, 230.20, 230.25, 230.30, 230.32 or 230.40 of the penal law aris- 8 ing out of conduct engaged in at the same premises consisting of a 9 dwelling as that term is defined in subdivision four of section four of 10 the multiple dwelling law shall be presumptive evidence of unlawful use 11 of such premises and of the owners knowledge of the same. 12 § 41. Subdivision 2 of section 715 of the real property actions and 13 proceedings law, as amended by chapter 368 of the laws of 2015, is 14 amended to read as follows: 15 2. For purposes of this section, two or more convictions of any person 16 or persons had, within a period of one year, for any of the offenses 17 described in section [230.00,] 230.05, 230.06, 230.11, 230.12, 230.13, 18 230.20, 230.25, 230.30, 230.32 or 230.40 of the penal law arising out of 19 conduct engaged in at the same real property consisting of a dwelling as 20 that term is defined in subdivision four of section four of the multiple 21 dwelling law shall be presumptive evidence of conduct constituting use 22 of the premises for purposes of prostitution. 23 § 42. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 4 of section 509-cc of the vehicle 24 and traffic law, as amended by chapter 92 of the laws of 2021, is 25 amended to read as follows: 26 (c) The offenses referred to in subparagraph (i) of paragraph (b) of 27 subdivision one and subparagraph (i) of paragraph (c) of subdivision two 28 of this section that result in disqualification for a period of five 29 years shall include a conviction under sections 100.10, 105.13, 115.05, 30 former sections 120.03, 120.04, 120.04-a, 120.05, 120.10, 120.25, 31 121.12, 121.13, 125.40[,] and 125.45, sections 130.20, 130.25, 130.52, 32 130.55, 135.10, 135.55, 140.17, 140.25, 140.30, 145.12, 150.10, 150.15, 33 160.05, 160.10, 220.06, 220.09, 220.16, 220.31, 220.34, 220.60, 220.65, 34 subdivision two of section 222.50, subdivision two of section 222.55, 35 former section 230.00, sections 230.05, 230.06, 230.11, 230.12, 230.13, 36 230.19, 230.20, 235.05, 235.06, 235.07, 235.21, 240.06, 245.00, 260.10, 37 subdivision two of section 260.20 and sections 260.25, 265.02, 265.03, 38 265.08, 265.09, 265.10, 265.12, 265.35 of the penal law or an attempt to 39 commit any of the aforesaid offenses under section 110.00 of the penal 40 law, or any similar offenses committed under a former section of the 41 penal law, or any offenses committed under a former section of the penal 42 law which would constitute violations of the aforesaid sections of the 43 penal law, or any offenses committed outside this state which would 44 constitute violations of the aforesaid sections of the penal law. 45 § 43. Severability. If any provision or term of this act is for any 46 reason declared unconstitutional or invalid or ineffective by any compe- 47 tent jurisdiction, such decision shall not affect the validity of the 48 effectiveness of the remaining portions of this act or any part thereof. 49 § 44. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 50 have become a law; provided that the amendments to section 483-ee of the 51 social services law made by section twenty-six of this act shall not 52 affect the repeal of such section and shall be deemed repealed there- 53 with. Effective immediately the addition, amendment and/or repeal of 54 any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of this act on 55 its effective date are authorized to be made and completed on or before 56 such date.